California statutes. Insurance Code
(e) “Ancillary state” means any state other than a domiciliary state.

(f) “Reciprocal state” means any state other than this state in which in substance and effect the provisions of this act are in force, including the provisions requiring that the commissioner or equivalent insurance supervisory official be the receiver of a delinquent insurer. A “reciprocal state” includes any state also which has, through its commissioner or equivalent supervisory official, entered into a binding and enforceable written agreement with the commissioner of this state which provides that (1) a commissioner or equivalent supervisory official is required to be the receiver of a delinquent insurer; (2) title to assets of the delinquent insurer shall vest in the domiciliary receiver, as of the date of any court order appointing him or her as receiver, and he or she shall have the same rights to recover those assets as provided under subdivision (b) of Section 1064.3; (3) nondomiciliary creditors may file and prove their claims before ancillary receivers; (4) the laws of the domiciliary state of the delinquent insurer shall be applied uniformly to residents and nonresidents in the allowance of preference of claims, except for claims to special deposits created under the laws of the domiciliary state; (5) preferences (including attachments, garnishments, and liens) for creditors with advance information shall be prevented; and (6) the domiciliary receiver may sue in the reciprocal state to recover any assets of a delinquent insurer to which he or she may be entitled under the law.

(g) “General assets” means all property, real, personal, or otherwise, not specifically mortgaged, pledged, deposited, or otherwise encumbered for the security or benefit of specified persons or limited class or classes of persons, and as to such specifically encumbered property the term includes all such property or its proceeds in excess of the amount necessary to discharge the sum or sums secured thereby. Assets held in trust and assets held on deposit for the security or benefit of all policyholders or all policyholders and creditors in the United States, shall be deemed general assets.

(h) “Preferred claim” means any claim with respect to which the law of a state accords priority of payment from the general assets of the insurer.

(i) “Special deposit claim” means any claim secured by a deposit made for the security or benefit of a limited class or classes of persons, but not including any general assets.

(j) “Secured claim” means any claim secured by mortgage, trust, deed, pledge, deposit as security, escrow, or otherwise, but not including special deposit claims or claims against general assets. The term also includes claims, which more than four months prior to the commencement of delinquency proceedings in the state of the insurer’s domicile, have become liens upon specific assets by reason of judicial process.

(k) “Receiver” means receiver, liquidator, rehabilitator, or conservator as the context may require.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1466, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1064.2.

(a) Whenever under the laws of this state a receiver is to be appointed in delinquency proceedings for an insurer domiciled in this state, the court shall appoint the commissioner as receiver. Upon the appointment, the court shall direct the receiver forthwith to take possession of the assets of the insurer and to administer them under the orders of the court.

(b) The domiciliary receiver and his or her successors in office shall be vested by operation of law with the title to all of the property, contracts, and rights of action, and all of the books and records of the insurer wherever located, as of the date of the order of his or her appointment, and he or she shall have the right to recover the same and reduce them to possession; except that ancillary receivers in reciprocal states shall have, as to assets located in their respective states, the rights and powers which are prescribed in this article for ancillary receivers appointed in this state as to assets located in this state. The filing or recording of the order appointing the receiver or certified copy thereof, in the office where instruments affecting title to property are required to be filed or recorded shall impart the same notice as would be imparted by a deed, bill of sale, or other evidence of title duly filed or recorded. The domiciliary receiver shall be responsible on his or her official bond for the proper administration of all assets coming into his or her possession or control.

(c) Upon taking possession of the assets of a delinquent insurer the domiciliary receiver shall, subject to the direction of the court, and in accordance with those procedures that the receiver may petition the court to establish, immediately proceed to conduct the business of the insurer or to take the steps authorized by the laws of this state for the purpose of liquidating, rehabilitating, reorganizing, or conserving the affairs of the insurer. In connection with delinquency proceedings, he or she may appoint one or more special deputy commissioners to act for him or her, and may employ clerks and assistants as he or she deems necessary. The compensation of the special deputies, clerks, or assistants and all expenses of taking possession of the delinquent insurer and of conducting the delinquency proceedings shall be fixed by the receiver, subject to the approval of the court, and shall be paid out of the funds or assets of the insurer. Within the limits of the duties imposed upon them, special deputies shall possess all the powers given to them, and, in the exercise of those powers, shall be subject to all of the duties imposed upon the receiver with respect to delinquency proceedings.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 893, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

1064.3.

(a) Whenever under the laws of this state an ancillary receiver is to be appointed in delinquency proceedings for an insurer not domiciled in this state, the court shall appoint the commissioner as ancillary receiver. The commissioner shall file an application requesting the appointment (1) if he or she finds that there are sufficient assets of that insurer located in this state, or that there are sufficient persons residing in this state having claims against that insurer, to justify the appointment of an ancillary receiver, or (2) if 10 or more persons resident in this state having claims against that insurer file an application with the commissioner requesting the appointment of an ancillary receiver.

(b) The domiciliary receiver of an insurer domiciled in a reciprocal state, shall be vested by operation of law with the title to all of the property, contracts, and rights of action, and all of the books and records of the insurer located in this state, and he or she shall have the immediate right to recover balances due from local agents and to obtain possession of any books and records of the insurer found in this state. He or she shall also be entitled to recover the other assets of the insurer located in this state except that upon the appointment of an ancillary receiver in this state, the ancillary receiver shall, during the ancillary receivership proceedings, have the sole right to recover such other assets. The ancillary receiver shall, as soon as practicable, liquidate from their respective securities those special deposit claims and secured claims which are proved and allowed in the ancillary proceedings in this state, and shall pay the necessary expenses of the proceedings. All remaining assets shall be promptly transferred to the domiciliary receiver. Subject to the foregoing provisions, the ancillary receiver and his or her deputies shall have the same powers and be subject to the same duties with respect to the administration of such assets, as a receiver of an insurer domiciled in this state.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this article, in any ancillary receivership proceeding in this state against an insurer domiciled in a reciprocal state, assets located in this state which comprise all or part of any deposit by that insurer under the laws of that reciprocal state for the benefit and security of beneficiaries of awards of workers’ compensation against insurers shall be returned promptly to the domiciliary receiver, if he or she so requests, without deduction of any amounts to satisfy claims of policyholders and creditors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1466, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1064.4.

(a) In a delinquency proceeding begun in this state against an insurer domiciled in this state, claimants residing in reciprocal states may file claims either with the ancillary receivers, if any in their respective states, or with the domiciliary receiver. All claims shall be filed on or before the last date fixed for the filing of claims in the domiciliary delinquency proceedings.

(b) Controverted claims belonging to claimants residing in reciprocal states may either (1) be proved in this state as provided by law, or (2), if ancillary proceedings have been commenced in those reciprocal states, be proved in those proceedings. In the event a claimant elects to prove his or her claim in ancillary proceedings, if notice of the claim and opportunity to appear and be heard is afforded the domiciliary receiver of this state as provided in Section 1064.5 with respect to ancillary proceedings in this state, the final allowance of such claim by the courts in the ancillary state shall be accepted in this state as conclusive as to its amount, and shall also be accepted as conclusive as to its priority, if any, against special deposits or other security located within the ancillary state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1466, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1064.5.

(a) In a delinquency proceeding in a reciprocal state against an insurer domiciled in that state, claimants against such insurer who reside within this state may file claims either with the ancillary receiver, if any, appointed in this state, or with the domiciliary receiver. All such claims shall be filed on or before the last date fixed for the filing of claims in the domiciliary delinquency proceeding.

(b) Controverted claims belonging to claimants residing in this state may either (1) be proved in the domiciliary state as provided by the laws of that state, or (2), if ancillary proceedings have been commenced in this state, be proved in those proceedings. In the event that any such claimant elects to prove his or her claim in this state, he or she shall file his or her claim with the ancillary receiver in the manner provided by the law of this state for the proving of claims against insurers domiciled in this state, and he or she shall give notice in writing to the receiver in the domiciliary state, either by registered mail or by personal service at least 40 days prior to the date set for hearing. The notice shall contain a concise statement of the amount of the claim, the facts on which the claim is based, and the priorities asserted, if any. If the domiciliary receiver, within 30 days after the giving of notice, shall give notice in writing to the ancillary receiver and to the claimant, either by registered mail or by personal service, of his or her intention to contest that claim, he or she shall be entitled to appear or to be represented in any proceeding in this state involving the adjudication of the claim. The final allowance of the claim by the courts of this state shall be accepted as conclusive as to its amount, and shall also be accepted as conclusive as to its priority, if any, against special deposits or other security located within this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1466, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1064.6.

(a) In a delinquency proceeding against an insurer domiciled in this state, claims owing to residents of ancillary states shall be preferred claims if like claims are preferred under the laws of this state. All such claims, whether owing to residents or nonresidents, shall be given equal priority of payment from general assets regardless of where such assets are located.

(b) In a delinquency proceeding against an insurer domiciled in a reciprocal state, claims owing to residents of this state shall be preferred if like claims are preferred by the laws of that state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1466, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1064.7.

The owners of special deposit claims against an insurer for which a receiver is appointed in this or any other state shall be given priority against their several special deposits in accordance with the provisions governing the creation and maintenance of such deposits. If there is a deficiency in any such deposit so that the claims secured thereby are not fully discharged therefrom, the claimants may share in the general assets, but, unless applicable law provides otherwise, the sharing shall be deferred until general creditors, and also claimants against other special deposits who have received smaller percentages from their respective special deposits, have been paid percentages of their claims equal to the percentage paid from the special deposit.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1466, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1064.8.

The owner of a secured claim against an insurer for which a receiver has been appointed in this or any other state may surrender his or her security and file his or her claim as a general creditor, or the claim may be discharged by resort to the security, in which case the deficiency, if any, shall be treated as a claim against the general assets of the insurer on the same basis as claims of unsecured creditors. If the amount of the deficiency has been adjudicated in ancillary proceedings as provided in this article, or if it has been adjudicated by a court of competent jurisdiction in proceedings in which the domiciliary receiver has had notice and opportunity to be heard, that amount shall be conclusive; otherwise the amount shall be determined in the delinquency proceeding in the domiciliary state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1466, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1064.9.

During the pendency of delinquency proceedings in this or any reciprocal state, no action or proceeding in the nature of an attachment, garnishment, or execution shall be commenced or maintained in the courts of this state against the delinquent insurer or its assets. Any lien obtained by any such action or proceeding within four months prior to the commencement of any such delinquency proceeding or at any time thereafter shall be void as against any rights arising in such delinquency proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1466, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1064.10.

The domiciliary receiver of an insurer domiciled in a reciprocal state may sue in this state to recover any assets of that insurer to which he or she may be entitled under the laws of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1466, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1064.11.

If any provision of this article or the application thereof to any person or circumstances is held invalid, that invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the article which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this article are declared to be severable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 1466, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

1064.12.

(a) This article may be referred to as the “Uniform Insurers Rehabilitation Act.”

(b) The Uniform Insurers Rehabilitation Act shall be so interpreted and construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of those states that enact it. To the extent that its provisions, when applicable, conflict with Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010), the provisions of this article shall control. The provisions of Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010) not in conflict with this article shall be unaffected by it.

(c) This article does not apply in regard to insurers domiciled in any state that is not a reciprocal state, and to any insurer domiciled in a reciprocal state before that state appoints a domiciliary receiver for the insurer. All those insurers shall be governed by Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010). If a domiciliary receiver is appointed in a reciprocal state while a receivership is proceeding under Article 14 (commencing with Section 1010), the receiver under that article shall thereafter act as ancillary receiver under Section 1064.3.

(d) This article shall not apply to the State Compensation Insurance Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 740, Sec. 4.2.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

1064.13.

(a) Upon receipt of a notice of liquidation the commissioner shall cease imposing, billing or collecting fees and assessments against the subject company pursuant to this code.

(b) Upon receipt of a notice of conservation or administrative supervision the commissioner may cease to impose, bill, or collect fees against the subject company pursuant to this code. Following the date the order has been lifted the commissioner may once again impose, bill, or collect fees against the subject company.

(c) Upon receipt of a notice of liquidation all outstanding invoices, billings or assessments pursuant to this code prior to the date of the notice shall be cancelled.

(d) Upon issuance of a notice of conservation or administrative supervision, outstanding amounts due from the subject company imposed prior to the date of the conservation or administrative supervision, may be held in abeyance and remain unpaid until the conservation or administrative supervision is terminated. Late filing fees accrued pursuant to Section 12995 of this code shall not be imposed.

(e) If it is determined that an insurer is in any of the conditions enumerated in Section 1011, and it is determined that all available funds are needed to pay policyholders, the commissioner may suspend the imposition of fees or assessments until the condition of the insurer has improved to the extent where payment of fees or assessments will not harm policyholders.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 740, Sec. 4.4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14.5. Stop Order Power of the Commissioner [1065.1. - 1065.7.]

1065.1.

Whenever the commissioner has reasonable cause to believe, and determines, after a public hearing, that any person specified in Section 1010 is conducting its business and affairs in such a manner as to threaten to render it insolvent, or that it is in a hazardous condition, or is conducting its business and affairs in a manner which is hazardous to its policyholders, creditors or the public, or that it has committed or engaged in, or is committing or engaging in, any act, practice, or transaction which under any provision of this code would constitute ground rendering the person subject to conservation or liquidation proceedings, he may make and serve upon the person such order or orders as shall be reasonably necessary to correct, eliminate or remedy such conduct, condition or ground.

The commissioner shall serve notice of any hearing required by this article upon the person, stating the time and place therefor, and the conduct, condition or ground upon which the commissioner would make his order. The hearing shall occur not less than 20 nor more than 30 days after notice is served upon the person.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1579.)
-------------------------------------------

1065.2.

(a) Whenever it appears to the commissioner that any conduct, condition or ground set forth in Section 1065.1 exists, and that irreparable loss and injury to the property and business of a person specified in Section 1010 has occurred or may occur unless the commissioner acts immediately, the commissioner may, without notice, and before hearing, issue and cause to be served upon such person an order requiring such person to forthwith cease and desist from engaging further in the acts, practices or transactions which are causing such conduct, condition or ground to exist.

(b) At the same time an order is served pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section, the commissioner shall issue and also serve upon the person a notice of hearing to be held at a time and place fixed therein which shall not be less than 20 or more than 30 days after the service thereof. The notice shall contain a statement of the conduct, condition or ground which the commissioner deems violative of the provisions of Section 1065.1.

(c) At any time prior to the commencement of a hearing as provided in Section 1065.1 or subdivision (b) of this section, the person may waive the hearing and have judicial review of the order by means of any remedy afforded by law without first exhausting administrative remedies or procedures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1579.)
-------------------------------------------

1065.3.

If, after hearing as provided by Section 1065.1 or subdivision (b) of Section 1065.2, any of the statements as to conduct, conditions, or grounds in the notice are found to be true, the commissioner shall make an order or orders as may be reasonably necessary to correct, eliminate, or remedy the conduct, conditions, or grounds. As part of the order or orders, the commissioner may also order the person to whom the order is directed to fully reimburse the commissioner for the commissioner’s costs in investigating, examining, and prosecuting the matter. An order of reimbursement shall be enforced as provided in Section 1065.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 782, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

1065.4.

Any person subject to an order or proceeding pursuant to this article shall be entitled to judicial review of the order or proceeding by means of any remedy afforded by law. Proceedings for judicial review shall be commenced within 60 days from the making and service of any order issued pursuant to Sections 1065.1 or 1065.3.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1579.)
-------------------------------------------

1065.5.

If any person violates or fails to comply with any order of the commissioner or any part thereof which as to such person has become final and is still in effect, the commissioner may, after a hearing, notice of which shall be given in accordance with the provisions of Section 1065.1, at which it is determined that a violation of such order has been committed, further order that:

(a) Such person shall forfeit and pay to the State of California a sum not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) per day for each and every day that such violation or failure to comply shall continue, but in no event to exceed a maximum amount of five thousand dollars ($5,000). Such liability shall be enforced in an action brought in any court of competent jurisdiction by the commissioner in the name of the people of the State of California; and that

(b) Proceedings be commenced to revoke or suspend any license or certificate of authority held by such person under this code, in accordance with the procedures provided therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1579.)
-------------------------------------------

1065.6.

The powers vested in the commissioner by this article shall be additional to any and all other powers and remedies vested in the commissioner by law, and nothing herein shall be construed as requiring that the commissioner shall employ the powers conferred herein instead of or as a condition precedent to the exercise of any other power or remedy vested in the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1579.)
-------------------------------------------

1065.7.

Any order or notice of the commissioner hereunder may be served on any person, in the same manner and with the same effect as provided for in civil actions in a superior court of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1579.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14.7. California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association [1067. - 1067.19.]

1067.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 974, Sec. 1.7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.01.

(a) The purpose of this article is to protect, subject to certain limitations, the persons specified in Section 1067.02 against failure in the performance of contractual obligations, under life and health insurance policies and annuity contracts specified in Section 1067.02, because of the impairment or insolvency of the member insurer that issued the policies or contracts.

(b) To provide this protection, an association of insurers is created to pay benefits and to continue coverages as limited herein, and members of the association are subject to assessment to provide funds to carry out the purposes of this article.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 974, Sec. 1.7.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.02.

(a) This article shall provide coverage for the policies and contracts specified in subdivision (b) to all of the following:

(1) To persons who, regardless of where they reside (except for nonresident certificate holders under group policies or contracts), are the beneficiaries, assignees, or payees of the persons covered under paragraph (2).

(2) To persons who are owners of or certificate holders under the policies or contracts, other than structured settlement annuities, and in each case who either:

(A) Are residents of this state.

(B) Are not residents, but only under all of the following conditions:

(i) The insurer that issued the policies or contracts is domiciled in this state.

(ii) The states in which the persons reside have associations similar to the association created by this article.

(iii) The persons are not eligible for coverage by the association in their resident state due to the fact that the insurer was not licensed in that state at the time specified in that state’s guaranty association law.

(3) For structured settlement annuities specified in subdivision (b), paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subdivision shall not apply, and this article shall, except as provided in paragraphs (4) and (5) of this
 subdivision, provide coverage to a person who is a payee under a structured settlement annuity, or beneficiary of a payee if the payee is deceased, if the payee is either:

(A) A resident of this state, regardless of where the contract owner resides.

(B) Not a resident, but only if both of the following conditions are satisfied:

(i) The contract owner of the structured settlement annuity is a resident, or the contract owner of the structured settlement annuity is not a resident, but the insurer that issued the structured settlement annuity is domiciled in this state, and the state in which the contract owner resides has an association similar to the association created by this article.

(ii) Neither the payee, or beneficiary, nor the contract owner is
 eligible for coverage by the association of the state in which the payee or contract owner resides.

(4) This article shall not provide coverage to a person who is a payee, or beneficiary, of a contract owner resident of this state, if the payee, or beneficiary, is afforded coverage by the association of another state.

(5) This article is intended to provide coverage to a person who is a resident of this state and, in special circumstances, to a nonresident. In order to avoid duplicate coverage, if a person who would otherwise receive coverage under this article is provided coverage under the laws of any other state, the person shall not be provided coverage under this article. In determining the application of the provisions of this paragraph in situations where a person could be covered by the association of more than one state, whether as an owner, payee, beneficiary, or
 assignee, this article shall be construed in conjunction with other state laws to result in coverage by only one association.

(b) (1) This article shall provide coverage to the persons specified in subdivision (a) for direct, nongroup life, health, or annuity policies or contracts, and supplemental contracts to any of these, and for certificates under direct group policies and contracts, except as limited by this article. Annuity contracts and certificates under group annuity contracts include allocated funding agreements, structured settlement annuities, and any immediate or deferred annuity contracts. The health policies and contracts covered under this article include, but are not limited to, basic hospital, medical, and surgical insurance, major medical insurance, disability income insurance, disability insurance, including insurance appertaining to injury, disablement, or death resulting to the insured from accidents,
 and appertaining to disablements resulting to the insured from sickness, and long-term care insurance, including any net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values.

(2) This article shall not provide coverage for any of the following:

(A) Any portion of a policy or contract not guaranteed by the insurer, or under which the risk is borne by the policy owner or contract owner.

(B) Any policy or contract of reinsurance, unless assumption certificates have been issued pursuant to the reinsurance policy or contract.

(C) A portion of a policy or contract to the extent that the rate of interest on which it is based or the interest rate, crediting rate, or similar factor determined by the use of an index or other external reference which is stated in the
 policy or contract and employed in calculating returns or changes in value does both of the following:

(i) Averaged over the period of four years prior to the date on which the member insurer becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer under this article exceeds the rate of interest determined by subtracting two percentage points from Moody’s Corporate Bond Yield Average averaged for that same four-year period or for the lesser period if the policy or contract was issued less than four years before the member insurer becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer under this article, not to go below a minimum of 0 percent.

(ii) On and after the date on which the member insurer becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer under this article exceeds the rate of interest determined by subtracting three percentage points from Moody’s Corporate Bond Yield Average as most recently available, not to
 go below a minimum of 0 percent.

(D) An unallocated annuity contract.

(E) A portion of a policy or contract issued to a plan or program of an employer, association, or other person to provide life, health, or annuity benefits to its employees, members, or others, to the extent that the plan or program is self-funded or uninsured, including, but not limited to, benefits payable by an employer, association, or other person under any of the following:

(i) A multiple employer welfare arrangement as defined in Section 1144 of Title 29 of the United States Code.

(ii) A minimum premium group insurance plan.

(iii) A stop-loss group insurance plan.

(iv) An administrative services only contract.

(F) A portion of a policy or contract to the extent that it provides for any of the following:

(i) Dividends or experience rating credits.

(ii) Voting rights.

(iii) Payment of any fees or allowances to any person, including the policy or contract owner, in connection with the service to or administration of the policy or contract.

(G) Any policy or contract issued in this state by a member insurer at a time when it was not licensed or did not have a certificate of authority to issue the policy or contract in this state.

(H) Any annuity issued by a charitable organization that is duly qualified as such under applicable provisions of the Internal Revenue Code, and that is not engaged in the business of insurance as its primary business.

(I) A portion of a policy or contract to the extent that the assessments required by Section 1067.08 with respect to the policy or contract are preempted or otherwise not permitted by federal or state law.

(J) An obligation that does not arise under the express written terms of the policy or contract issued by the insurer to the contract owner or policy owner, including without limitation, any of the following:

(i) Claims based on marketing materials.

(ii) Claims based on side letters, riders, or other documents that were
 issued by the insurer without meeting applicable policy form filing or approval requirements.

(iii) Misrepresentations of, or regarding, policy benefits.

(iv) Extracontractual claims.

(v) A claim for penalties or consequential or incidental damages.

(K) A contractual agreement that establishes the member insurer’s obligations to provide a book value accounting guaranty for defined contribution benefit plan participants by reference to a portfolio of assets that is owned by the benefit plan or its trustee, which in each case is not an affiliate of the member insurer.

(L) A portion of a policy or contract to the extent it provides for interest or other changes in value to be determined by
 the use of an index or other external reference stated in the policy or contract, but which have not been credited to the policy or contract, or as to which the policy or contract owner’s rights are subject to forfeiture, as of the date the member insurer becomes an impaired or insolvent insurer under this article, whichever is earlier. If a policy’s or contract’s interest or changes in value are credited less frequently than annually, then for purposes of determining the values that have been credited and are not subject to forfeiture pursuant to this subparagraph, the interest or change in value determined by using the procedures defined in the policy or contract shall be credited as if the contractual date of crediting interest or changing values was the date of impairment or insolvency, whichever is earlier, and shall not be subject to forfeiture.

(M) A policy or contract providing any hospital, medical, prescription drug, or other health
 care benefits pursuant to Part C of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-21 et seq.) or Part D of Title XVIII of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1395w-101 et seq.), commonly known as Medicare Parts C and D, or any regulations issued pursuant thereto.

(c) The benefits for which the association may become liable for life insurance and annuity policies shall in no event exceed the lesser of the following:

(1) Eighty percent of the contractual obligations for each policy or contract as modified pursuant to subparagraph (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b), for which the insurer is liable or would have been liable if it were not an impaired or insolvent insurer.

(2) (A) With respect to any one life, regardless of the number of policies or contracts:

(i) Three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) in life insurance death benefits, but not more than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) in net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values for life insurance.

(ii) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in the present value of annuity benefits, including net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values.

(B) With respect to each payee of a structured settlement annuity, or beneficiaries of the payee if deceased, two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) in present value annuity benefits, in the aggregate, including net cash surrender and net cash withdrawal values.

(C) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A) and (B), in no event shall the association be obligated to cover more than an aggregate of
 three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) in benefits with respect to any one life under subparagraphs (A) and (B).

(D) Notwithstanding subparagraphs (A), (B), and (C), with respect to one owner of multiple nongroup policies of life insurance, whether the policy owner is an individual, firm, corporation, or other person, and whether the persons insured are officers, managers, employees, or other persons, in no event shall the association be obligated to cover more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) in benefits, regardless of the number of policies and contracts held by the owner.

(d) The health insurance benefits for which the association may become liable shall in no event exceed the lesser of the following:

(1) The contractual obligations for which the insurer is liable or for which the insurer would have been
 liable if it were not an impaired or insolvent insurer.

(2) With respect to any one individual receiving health care benefits, regardless of the number of policies or contracts, two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) in health insurance benefits; an amount that shall increase or decrease based upon changes in the health care cost component of the consumer price index from January 1, 1991, to the date on which the insurer becomes an insolvent insurer.

(e) The limitations set forth in subdivisions (c) and (d) are limitations on the benefits for which the association is obligated before taking into account either its subrogation and assignment rights or the extent to which those benefits could be provided out of the assets of the impaired or insolvent insurer attributable to covered policies. The costs of the association’s obligations under this article may be met by the use of
 assets attributable to covered policies or reimbursed to the association pursuant to its subrogation and assignment rights.

(f) In performing its obligations to provide coverage under Section 1067.07, the association shall not be required to guarantee, assume, reinsure, or perform, or cause to be guaranteed, assumed, reinsured, or performed, the contractual obligations of the insolvent or impaired insurer under a covered policy or contract that do not materially affect the economic values or economic benefits of the covered policy or contract.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 334, Sec. 2.   (SB 1408)   Effective September 27, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.03.

This article shall be liberally construed to effect the purpose under Section 1067.01.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 334, Sec. 3.   (SB 1408)   Effective September 27, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

1067.04.

As used in this article:

(a) “Account” means either of the two accounts created under Section 1067.05.

(b) “Association” means the California Life and Health Insurance Guarantee Association created pursuant to Section 1067.05.

(c) “Authorized assessment” means an assessment, to be called immediately or in the future from member insurers for a specified amount, that is authorized by a resolution of the board of directors. “Authorized,” when used in the context of assessments, means authorized by a resolution of the board of directors. An assessment is authorized when this
 resolution is passed.

(d) “Benefit plan” means a specific employee, union, or association of natural persons benefit plan.
